Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Part 3 Application, Examination and Issuance
31-10.3-32.
Contents and issuance of commercial driver’s license.

The commercial driver’s license shall be, to the maximum extent practicable, tamper-proof and shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

The full legal name and current legal residential or mailing address of the licensee.

A physical description of the licensee, including sex, height, weight, hair, and eye color.

The licensee’s date of birth and any other identifier deemed appropriate by the department.

The class(es) of commercial motor vehicle or vehicles which the licensee is authorized to operate.

Any restrictions which may apply to the license or licensee.

Endorsements under which the licensee is authorized to operate a commercial motor vehicle.

The date of issuance and expiration of the license.

Whether the license is an original or duplicate.

Organ donor information.

Color photograph of the licensee.

The signature of the licensee.

A prominent statement indicating that the license is a “commercial driver’s license” which may be abbreviated “CDL”.

Any other information deemed appropriate by the administrator.

Before issuing a commercial driver’s license, the department shall notify the Commercial Driver’s License Information System (C.D.L.I.S.) of the proposed issuance of the license and provide the information required to ensure identification of the licensee. The department shall also request all information pertaining to the driving record of the licensee from any other state or province of Canada which has issued a driver’s license to the licensee over the prior ten (10) year period and from the National Driver Register.

Within ten (10) days after issuing a commercial driver’s license, the department shall notify the commercial driver’s license information system of that fact and provide all information required to ensure identification of the licensee.

The department shall maintain copies of all documents including, but not limited to, the application, commercial driver’s license issued, and any other documents pertaining to the licensee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 77, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 82, § 2.

31-10.3-33.
Notification of traffic violations.

Every clerk of the courts within the state of Rhode Island shall, within ten (10) days after receiving a report of the conviction of any resident or nonresident holder of a commercial driver’s license of any violation of state law, federal law, or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than parking violations, committed in a commercial motor vehicle, notify the division of motor vehicles and the licensing authority of the offender and the offense committed.

This notice shall contain:

The name and residence address of the driver.

The date of birth of the driver.

The social security number and the license number of the driver and the state of issuance.

The violation of which the driver was convicted.

An indication that the person was operating a commercial motor vehicle.

The amount of any jail time, fine, costs, or conditions assessed for the violation.

The name of the court and city or county in which the conviction occurred.

The administrator shall notify the issuing state of any revocation, suspension, cancellation or disqualification of an out-of-state commercial driver’s license holder’s privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle for at least sixty (60) days. Notification shall be made no later than ten (10) days after disqualifying, revoking, canceling or suspending the out-of-state commercial driver’s license holder’s privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle. Notification shall include the disqualification and the violation which resulted in the disqualification, revocation, suspension or cancellation. This information shall be recorded on the driver’s record.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 297, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 298, § 1.

31-10.3-34.
Abstracts of driver records.

The administrator shall, upon request, furnish a certified abstract of the record of any commercial operator on file fully designating the record of all convictions or adjudications of the commercial operator of any violations of the provisions of this chapter and the record of all the commercial operator’s involvement(s) in accidents required to be reported pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. If the commercial operator shall have no record, the administrator shall so certify. The administrator shall collect for each certificate the sum required in §

31-2-10

; provided, that if the request for a certificate is made by any governmental agency, bureau, or department for use in its official capacity, the administrator shall collect no fee. The requirement of this section that the certificate be certified shall make the certificate admissible as legal evidence in any legal proceeding whether criminal or civil. The administrator shall also provide on the certificate the person’s license number, date of birth, name, social security number, endorsements, classifications, and/or restrictions, and any other information deemed necessary by the administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1.

31-10.3-35.
Unlawful use of commercial license.

This section shall be governed under §

31-11-6

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1.

31-10.3-36.
Manufacture of commercial license — Unauthorized.

It shall be a felony for any person:

To photograph, photostat, duplicate, or in any way reproduce any driver’s license or facsimile of a license in any manner that it could be mistaken for a valid license;

To issue, sell, or cause to be sold a commercial license or facsimile of a license unless sold in compliance with the provision of this chapter, and unless authorized to do so by the administrator.

Any person violating subsection (a) of this section shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than five (5) years, and there may be imposed an additional fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and suspension of license or privileges for a period of not less than one year nor more than five (5) years, or a period of suspension commensurate with the sentence imposed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1.

31-10.3-37.
Prohibition on masking convictions.

No representative of the district court or traffic tribunal may utilize the provisions of §§

12-10-12

,

12-18-3

or through any other programs, mask, defer imposition of judgment or allow an individual to enter a diversion program that would prevent a CDL driver’s conviction for any violation, in any type of motor vehicle, of a state or local traffic control law (except a parking violation) from appearing on the driver’s record, whether the driver was convicted for an offense committed in the state where the driver is licensed or in another state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 77, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 82, § 3.

31-10.3-38.
Prohibition on use of hand-held mobile telephones while driving a commercial motor vehicle.

Definitions. For the purpose of this section only:

“Driving” means operating a commercial motor vehicle on a highway, including while temporarily stationary because of traffic, a traffic-control device, or other momentary delays. Driving does not include operating a commercial motor vehicle when the driver has moved the vehicle to the side of, or off, a highway and has halted in a location where the vehicle can safely remain stationary.

“Mobile telephone” means a mobile communication device that falls under or uses any commercial mobile radio service, as defined in Part 20.3 of Title 47 of the Code of Federal Regulations, referred to as 47 C.F.R. 20.3. It does not include two-way or citizens band radio services.

“Use a hand-held mobile telephone” means:

Using at least one hand to hold a mobile telephone to conduct a voice communication;

Dialing or answering a mobile telephone by pressing more than a single button; or

Reaching for a mobile telephone in a manner that requires a driver to maneuver so that he or she is no longer in a seated driving position, restrained by a seat belt that is installed in accordance with Part 393.93 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, referred to as 49 C.F.R. 393.93, and adjusted in accordance with the vehicle manufacturer’s instructions.

No driver shall use a hand-held mobile telephone while driving a commercial motor vehicle.

No motor carrier shall allow, or require its drivers to use, a hand-held mobile telephone while driving a commercial motor vehicle.

Emergency exception. Using a hand-held mobile telephone is permissible by drivers of a commercial motor vehicle when necessary to communicate with law enforcement officials or other emergency services.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 257, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 307, § 2.